Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
CHAPTER 2 Department of Community Health
31-2-17.
[Repealed effective December 1, 2022] Study of mental health care services; reporting; repealer.

The department shall undertake a study of the following:

Comparison of reimbursement rates for mental health services under Medicaid, PeachCare for Kids, and the state health benefit plan with other states;

Reimbursement for health care providers providing mental health care services under Medicaid, PeachCare for Kids, and the state health benefit plan and comparison with other states;

Reimbursement for hospitals caring for uninsured patients with mental health and substance abuse disorders in the emergency department for extended periods of time while the patient is waiting on placement and transfer to a behavioral health facility for evaluation and treatment;

An accurate accounting of mental health fund distribution across state agencies, including, but not limited to, the department, the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities, the Department of Human Services, and the Department of Juvenile Justice;

Medical necessity denials for adolescent mental and behavioral health services; and

Implementation of coordinated health care for any child who enters foster care such that Medicaid claims data shall be shared immediately with the Division of Family and Children Services of the Department of Human Services.

The department shall complete such study and submit its findings and recommendations to the Governor, General Assembly, the Office of Health Strategy and Coordination, and the Behavioral Health Reform and Innovation Commission no later than December 31, 2022.

This Code section shall stand repealed in its entirety by operation of law on December 31, 2022.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-2-17

, enacted by Ga. L. 2022, p. 26, § 6-1/HB 1013.

Effective date.

This Code section became effective July 1, 2022.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 3-2/HB 214, effective July 1, 2011, redesignated former Code Section 31-2-17 as present Code Section 31-2A-13.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2022, Code Section 31-2-17, as enacted by Ga. L. 2022, p. HB 1276, § 1/HB 1276, was redesignated as Code Section 31-2-18.

31-2-17.1.
Redesignated.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 3-2/HB 214, effective July 1, 2011, redesignated former Code Section 31-2-17.1 as present Code Section 31-2A-14.

31-2-18.
Website reporting on state health plans.

As used in this Code section, the term “state health plan” means:

Medical assistance program provided pursuant to Article 7 of Chapter 4 of Title 49;

PeachCare for Kids Program provided pursuant to Article 13 of Chapter 5 of Title 49;

The state employees’ health insurance plan established pursuant to Article 1 of Chapter 18 of Title 45;

The health insurance plan for public school teachers established pursuant to Subpart 2 of Part 6 of Article 17 of Chapter 2 of Title 20; and

The health insurance plan for public school employees established pursuant to Subpart 3 of Part 6 of Article 17 of Chapter 2 of Title 20.

On and after July 1, 2022, the department shall post in a prominent location on the department website a statistical report or reports containing data relating to the state health plans administered by the department. Such reports shall be updated and posted no less than biannually and shall contain, but shall not be limited to, the following metrics:

The number of, type of, and changes in enrolled providers;

County-level data on primary care providers enrolled per 1,000 people and indicating which counties fall below defined benchmarks;

Data on hospital utilization and costs, including but not limited to, the number of inpatient admissions, average length of stay, readmission rate, emergency department utilization information, including diagnosis and non-emergent utilization, and amounts paid per facility, including plan paid amounts or net payment per admission;

Membership or beneficiary enrollment data including demographic and population based reporting on common disease states;

Data on prescription drug spending, including data on aggregate payment amounts for the ten most frequently prescribed medications and the ten most costly medications, as well as historical data related to the volume and cost of such medications, whether brand name drug or generic brand drug utilization, and costs;

Financial results by aid category or plan group, as applicable, including per-member per-month cost figures for low-income Medicaid, PeachCare for Kids, and fee-for-service program categories; and

Long-term care data, including waiver services participation and net payments by category of service.

Nothing in this Code section shall be construed to require the inclusion in the report or reports posted pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code section of any information which would violate the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, P.L. 104-191, or which is exempt from disclosure under the provisions of Article 4 of Chapter 18 of Title 50, relating to open records.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-2-18

, enacted by Ga. L. 2022, p. 312, § 1/HB 1276.

Effective date.

This Code section became effective July 1, 2022.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 3-2/HB 214, effective July 1, 2011, redesignated former Code Section 31-2-18 as present Code Section 31-2A-15.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2022, this Code section enacted as Code Section 31-2-17 was redesignated as Code Section 31-2-18.

31-2-19.
[Repealed] Advisory Council for Public Health; members; meetings.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-2-19

, enacted by Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-1/HB 228; repealed by Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 4-5/HB 214, effective July 1, 2011.

31-2-20.
[Repealed] Public Health Commission; members; purpose; authority.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-2-20

, enacted by Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-1/HB 228; repealed by Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-1/HB 228, effective December 31, 2010.